src-fst-morphology-affixes-adjectives.lexc.md
* Adjective gradations 1 t~0 u examples:*
* *vimmattu:* `vimmattu+A+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # wicked)
* *vimmatussa:* `vimmattu+A+Sg+Ine`
* *vimmatuista:* `vimmattu+A+Pl+Ela`
* *vimmattuihin:* `vimmattu+A+Pl+Ill`
* *vimmatumpi:* `vimmattu+A+Comp+Sg+Nom`
* *vimmatuin:* `vimmattu+A+Superl+Sg+Nom`

The quantitative gradation of t before y is in class `ADJ_YLENNETTY`, 
which was ¹⁻C in the dictionary. 
The u stems with quantitative t gradation are commonest with nut participle
passive derivation’s front (-tty).

* Adjective gradations 1 t~0 y examples:*
* *ylennetty:* `ylennetty+A+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # promoted)
* *ylennetyssä:* `ylennetty+A+Sg+Ine`
* *ylennetyistä:* `ylennetty+A+Pl+Ela`
* *ylennettyihin:* `ylennetty+A+Pl+Ill`
* *ylennetympi:* `ylennetty+A+Comp+Sg+Nom`
* *ylennetyin:* `ylennetty+A+Superl+Sg+Nom`

The quantitative gradation of t before y is in class `ADJ_KYYTTÖ`, 
which was ¹⁻C in the dictionary. 

* Adjective gradations 1 t~0 ö examples:*
* *kyyttö:* `kyyttö+A+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # ?????)
* *kyytössä:* `kyyttö+A+Sg+Ine`
* *kyytöistä:* `kyyttö+A+Pl+Ela`
* *kyyttöihin:* `kyyttö+A+Pl+Ill`
* *kyytömpi:* `kyyttö+A+Comp+Sg+Nom`
* *kyytöin:* `kyyttö+A+Superl+Sg+Nom`

The quantitave k gradation has a variant that allows use of apostrophe
instead of nothing in the weak grade.

The class for o final bisyllabic stems with optional ’ is `ADJ_LAKO`,
this is a subset of dictionary class ¹⁻D. 

* Adjective gradations 1 k~’~0 o examples:*
* *lako:* `lako+A+Sg+Nom`
* *laossa:* `lako+A+Sg+Ine`
* *la’ossa:* `lako+A+Sg+Ine`
* *laompi:* `lako+A+Comp+Sg+Nom`
* *laoin:* `lako+A+Superl+Sg+Nom`

There's no k to optional apostrophe with u.
nor with y and k:
nor ö with k:
There's none with k gradating to always apostrophe either.
For examples of these, see noun classes

The qualitative gradation of p between vowels in o stems goes to v,
the class for this is `ADJ_KELPO`, the dictionary class for this is
¹⁻E.

* Adjective gradations 1 p~v o examples:*
* *kelpo:* `kelpo+A+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # proper)
* *kelvossa:* `kelpo+A+Sg+Ine`
* *kelpoina:* `kelpo+A+Pl+Ess`
* *kelvoista:* `kelpo+A+Pl+Ela`
* *kelvompi:* `kelpo+A+Comp+Sg+Nom`
* *kelvoin:* `kelpo+A+Superl+Sg+Nom`

There are none ending in vowel + pu
nor with y and p
nor ö with p.

The gradation of t ~ d after o is in class `ADJ_MIETO`, the
dictionary class for this is ¹⁻F.

* Adjective gradations 1 t~d o examples:*
* *mieto:* `mieto+A+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # mild)
* *miedossa:* `mieto+A+Sg+Ine`
* *mietoihin:* `mieto+A+Pl+Ill`
* *miedoista:* `mieto+A+Pl+Ela`
* *miedompi:* `mieto+A+Comp+Sg+Nom`
* *miedoin:* `mieto+A+Superl+Sg+Nom`

The gradation of t ~ d after u is in class `ADJ_VIIPALOITU`, the
dictionary class for this is ¹⁻F.
The commonest t ~ d variation in u stems comes from nut participle’s
passive’s back form (-tu).

* Adjective gradations 1 t~d u examples:*
* *viipaloitu:* `viipaloitu+A+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # sliced)
* *viipaloidussa:* `viipaloitu+A+Sg+Ine`
* *viipaloituihin:* `viipaloitu+A+Pl+Ill`
* *viipaloiduista:* `viipaloitu+A+Pl+Ela`
* *viipaloidumpi:* `viipaloitu+A+Comp+Sg+Nom`
* *viipaloiduin:* `viipaloitu+A+Superl+Sg+Nom`

The gradation of t ~ d after u is in class `ADJ_YKSILÖITY`, the
dictionary class for this is ¹⁻F.
The commonest t ~ d variation in u stems comes from nut participle’s
passive’s front form (-ty).

* Adjective gradations 1 t~d y examples:*
* *yksilöity:* `yksilöity+A+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # singled)
* *yksilöidyssä:* `yksilöity+A+Sg+Ine`
* *yksilöityihin:* `yksilöity+A+Pl+Ill`
* *yksilöidyistä:* `yksilöity+A+Pl+Ela`
* *yksilöidympi:* `yksilöity+A+Comp+Sg+Nom`
* *yksilöidyin:* `yksilöity+A+Superl+Sg+Nom`

And there's none with t and ö

The adjectives with -nko stem belong to class `ADJ_LENKO`, and the
dictionary class was ¹⁻G.

* Adjective gradations 1 k~g o examples:*
* *lenko:* `lenko+A+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # crooked)
* *lengossa:* `lenko+A+Sg+Ine`
* *lengoista:* `lenko+A+Pl+Ela`
* *lenkoihin:* `lenko+A+Pl+Ill`
* *lengompi:* `lenko+A+Comp+Sg+Nom`
* *lengoin:* `lenko+A+Superl+Sg+Nom`

There's no adjectives ending in nku
nor with y and nk
And ö with nk
There are no gradating p's after m's in unchanging stems
For all these, check the noun patterns.
The quantitative gradation of t after l in o stems is in class 
`ADJ_MELTO`, which corresponds to dictionary class ¹⁻I.

* Adjective gradations 1 t~l o examples:*
* *melto:* `melto+A+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # ?????)
* *mellossa:* `melto+A+Sg+Ine`
* *meltoihin:* `melto+A+Pl+Ill`
* *melloista:* `melto+A+Pl+Ela`
* *mellompi:* `melto+A+Comp+Sg+Nom`
* *melloin:* `melto+A+Superl+Sg+Nom`

The quantitative gradation of t after l in o stems is in class 
`ADJ_PARANNELTU`, which corresponds to dictionary class ¹⁻I.
The common u stem after l is in nut participles passive (-tu):

* Adjective gradations 1 t~l u examples:*
* *paranneltu:* `paranneltu+A+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # embettered)
* *parannellussa:* `paranneltu+A+Sg+Ine`
* *paranneltuihin:* `paranneltu+A+Pl+Ill`
* *parannelluista:* `paranneltu+A+Pl+Ela`
* *parannellumpi:* `paranneltu+A+Comp+Sg+Nom`
* *parannelluin:* `paranneltu+A+Superl+Sg+Nom`

The quantitative gradation of t after l in o stems is in class 
`ADJ_VÄHÄTELTY`, which corresponds to dictionary class ¹⁻I.
As with y and t:

* Adjective gradations 1 t~l y examples:*
* *vähätelty:* `vähätelty+A+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # belittled)
* *vähätellyssä:* `vähätelty+A+Sg+Ine`
* *vähäteltyihin:* `vähätelty+A+Pl+Ill`
* *vähätellyistä:* `vähätelty+A+Pl+Ela`
* *vähätellympi:* `vähätelty+A+Comp+Sg+Nom`
* *vähätellyin:* `vähätelty+A+Superl+Sg+Nom`

There's no adjective ending -ltö in our lexical database.

The quantitative gradation of t after n in o stems is in class 
`ADJ_VENTO`, which corresponds to dictionary class ¹⁻J.

* Adjective gradations 1 t~n o examples:*
* *vento:* `vento+A+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # ?)
* *vennossa:* `vento+A+Sg+Ine`
* *ventoihin:* `vento+A+Pl+Ill`
* *vennoista:* `vento+A+Pl+Ela`
* *vennompi:* `vento+A+Comp+Sg+Nom`
* *vennoin:* `vento+A+Superl+Sg+Nom`

The quantitative gradation of t after n in u stems is in class 
`ADJ_PANTU`, which corresponds to dictionary class ¹⁻I.
The common u stem after n is in nut participle’s passive’s back form (-tu):

* Adjective gradations 1 t~n u examples:*
* *pantu:* `pantu+A+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # brewed)
* *pannussa:* `pantu+A+Sg+Ine`
* *pantuihin:* `pantu+A+Pl+Ill`
* *pannuista:* `pantu+A+Pl+Ela`
* *pannumpi:* `pantu+A+Comp+Sg+Nom`
* *pannuin:* `pantu+A+Superl+Sg+Nom`

The quantitative gradation of t after n in y stems is in class 
`ADJ_MENTY`, which corresponds to dictionary class ¹⁻I.
The common u stem after n is in nut participle’s passive’s front form
(-ty):

* Adjective gradations 1 t~n y examples:*
* *menty:* `menty+A+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # belittled)
* *mennyssä:* `menty+A+Sg+Ine`
* *mentyihin:* `menty+A+Pl+Ill`
* *mennyistä:* `menty+A+Pl+Ela`
* *mennympi:* `menty+A+Comp+Sg+Nom`
* *mennyin:* `menty+A+Superl+Sg+Nom`

There are no adjectives ending in -ntö

The quantitative gradation of t after r in o stems is in class
`ADJ_MARTO`, which corresponds to dictionary class ¹⁻J.

* Adjective gradations 1 t~r o examples:*
* *marto:* `marto+A+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # ???)
* *marrossa:* `marto+A+Sg+Ine`
* *martoihin:* `marto+A+Pl+Ill`
* *marroista:* `marto+A+Pl+Ela`
* *marrompi:* `marto+A+Comp+Sg+Nom`
* *marroin:* `marto+A+Superl+Sg+Nom`

The quantitative gradation of t after r in u stems is in class
`ADJ_PURTU`, which corresponds to dictionary class ¹⁻J.
The common u stem after r is in nut participle’s passive’s back form (-tu):

* Adjective gradations 1 t~r u examples:*
* *purtu:* `purtu+A+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # bitten)
* *purrussa:* `purtu+A+Sg+Ine`
* *purtuihin:* `purtu+A+Pl+Ill`
* *purruista:* `purtu+A+Pl+Ela`
* *purrumpi:* `purtu+A+Comp+Sg+Nom`
* *purruin:* `purtu+A+Superl+Sg+Nom`

The quantitative gradation of t after r in y stems is in class
`ADJ_PIERTY`, which corresponds to dictionary class ¹⁻J.
The common u stem after r is in nut participle’s passive’s front fomr
(-ty):

* Adjective gradations 1 t~r y examples:*
* *pierty:* `pierty+A+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # befarted)
* *pierryssä:* `pierty+A+Sg+Ine`
* *piertyihin:* `pierty+A+Pl+Ill`
* *pierryistä:* `pierty+A+Pl+Ela`
* *pierrympi:* `pierty+A+Comp+Sg+Nom`
* *pierryin:* `pierty+A+Superl+Sg+Nom`

There are no adjectives ending in -rtö. Just as well, the
class for UkU : UvU- is limited to few nouns we know.

### The special illative alternation with k gradation, unaltering stems
The trisyllabic words ending with gradating long k have plural illative
in both strong and weak forms. 

The class for trisyllabic -kko stems is `ADJ_HUPAKKO`, the corresponding
dictionary class is ⁴⁻D. 

* Adjectives 4 o examples:*
* *hupakko:* `hupakko+A+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # silly girl)
* *hupakoihin:* `hupakko+A+Pl+Ill`
* *hupakkoihin:* `hupakko+A+Pl+Ill`
* *hupakompi:* `hupakko+A+Comp+Sg+Nom`
* *hupakoin:* `hupakko+A+Superl+Sg+Nom`

### Adjective stems with i:e variations
The i stems of new i final words have i : e : 0 variation. These classes
include new loans ending in consonant, which use -i to form inflectional
stems.
The i stems combined with gradation of will form five separate stem
variants:

The i finals with back vowel harmony go to class `ADJ_ABNORMI`, where
old dictionary classification was ⁵.

* Adjectives 5 back examples:*
* *abnormi:* `abnormi+A+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # abnorm)
* *abnormeina:* `abnormi+A+Pl+Ess`
* *abnormien:* `abnormi+A+Pl+Gen`
* *abnormimpi:* `abnormi+A+Comp+Sg+Nom`
* *abnormein:* `abnormi+A+Superl+Sg+Nom`

The i finals with front vowel harmony go to class `ADJ_STYDI`, where
old dictionary classification was ⁵.

* Adjectives 5 front examples:*
* *stydi:* `stydi+A+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # stiff)
* *stydeinä:* `stydi+A+Pl+Ess`
* *stydien:* `stydi+A+Pl+Gen`
* *stydimpi:* `stydi+A+Comp+Sg+Nom`
* *stydein:* `stydi+A+Superl+Sg+Nom`

Stems with quantitative k gradation, i final and back harmony are in class 
`ADJ_OPAAKKI` and dictionary class ⁵⁻A or ⁵⁻D.

* Adjectives 5 k~0 back examples:*
* *opaakki:* `opaakki+A+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # opaque)
* *opaakissa:* `opaakki+A+Sg+Ine`
* *opaakkeina:* `opaakki+A+Pl+Ess`
* *opaakeista:* `opaakki+A+Pl+Ela`
* *opaakkien:* `opaakki+A+Pl+Gen`
* *opaakimpi:* `opaakki+A+Comp+Sg+Nom`
* *opaakein:* `opaakki+A+Superl+Sg+Nom`

Stems with quantitative k gradation, i final and front harmony are in class
`ADJ_PINKKI` and dictionary class ⁵⁻A or ⁵⁻D.

* Adjectives 5 k~0 front examples:*
* *pinkki:* `pinkki+A+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # pink)
* *pinkissä:* `pinkki+A+Sg+Ine`
* *pinkkeinä:* `pinkki+A+Pl+Ess`
* *pinkeistä:* `pinkki+A+Pl+Ela`
* *pinkkien:* `pinkki+A+Pl+Gen`
* *pinkimpi:* `pinkki+A+Comp+Sg+Nom`
* *pinkein:* `pinkki+A+Superl+Sg+Nom`

There's no back vowel version of the bisyllabic gradating -ppi form.

Stems with quantitative p gradation, i final and front harmony are in class
`ADJ_SIPPI` and dictionary class ⁵⁻B.

* Adjectives 5 p~0 front examples:*
* *sippi:* `sippi+A+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # bust)
* *sipissä:* `sippi+A+Sg+Ine`
* *sippeinä:* `sippi+A+Pl+Ess`
* *sipeistä:* `sippi+A+Pl+Ela`
* *sippien:* `sippi+A+Pl+Gen`
* *sipimpi:* `sippi+A+Comp+Sg+Nom`
* *sipein:* `sippi+A+Superl+Sg+Nom`

Stems with quantitative t gradation, i final and back harmony are in class
`ADJ_HURTTI` and dictionary class ⁵⁻C.

* Adjectives 5 t~0 back examples:*
* *hurtti:* `hurtti+A+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # grunchy)
* *hurtissa:* `hurtti+A+Sg+Ine`
* *hurtteina:* `hurtti+A+Pl+Ess`
* *hurteista:* `hurtti+A+Pl+Ela`
* *hurttien:* `hurtti+A+Pl+Gen`
* *hurtimpi:* `hurtti+A+Comp+Sg+Nom`
* *hurtein:* `hurtti+A+Superl+Sg+Nom`

Stems with quantitative t gradation, i final and front harmony are in class
`ADJ_VÄÄRTTI` and dictionary class ⁵⁻C.

* Adjectives 5 t~0 front examples:*
* *väärtti:* `väärtti+A+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # worthy)
* *väärtissä:* `väärtti+A+Sg+Ine`
* *väärtteinä:* `väärtti+A+Pl+Ess`
* *väärteistä:* `väärtti+A+Pl+Ela`
* *väärttien:* `väärtti+A+Pl+Gen`
* *väärtimpi:* `väärtti+A+Comp+Sg+Nom`
* *väärtein:* `väärtti+A+Superl+Sg+Nom`

There are no bisyllabic adjectives ending in vowel and gradating -pi.

Stems with t ~ d gradation, i final and back harmony are in class
`ADJ_TUHTI` and dictionary class ⁵⁻F.
